Utah statutes.
36-23-101.5.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Committee" means the Occupational and Professional Licensure Review Committee created in Section 36-23-102.

(2)  "Newly regulate" means to regulate under Title 58, Occupations and Professions, an occupation or profession not regulated under Title 58 before the enactment of the new regulation.

(3)  "Proposal" means:

(a)  an application submitted under Section 36-23-105, with or without specific proposed statutory language;

(b)  a request for review by a legislator of the possibility of newly regulating an occupation or profession, with or without specific proposed statutory language; or

(c)  proposed or introduced legislation to newly regulate an occupation or profession referred to the committee by another legislative committee.

(4)  "Sunrise review" means a review under this chapter of a proposal to newly regulate an occupation or profession.



Enacted by Chapter 137, 2007 General Session

